Maryland, session 2025, HB1237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
1–206.
WHENEVER THIS ARTICLE REQUIRES NOTICE OF AN APPLICATION FOR A
PERMIT, LICENSE, OR OTHER AUTHORIZATION TO BE PUBLISHED IN A NEWSPAPER
OF GENERAL CIRCULATION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ACCEPT PUBLIC COMMENTS
ON THE APPLICATION FOR:
(1) THE TIME PERIOD SPECIFIED IN STATUTE OR REGULATION; OR
(2) IF NO TIME PERIOD IS SPECIFIED IN STATUTE OR REGULATION, AT
LEAST 14 DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF PUBLICATION.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1237*

HOUSE BILL 1237
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.